Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.045

College course requirements.

(1) The two-year college course required for funeral directors under this chapter shall consist of sixty semester or ninety quarter hours of instruction at a school, college, or university accredited by the Northwest Association of Schools and Colleges or other accrediting association approved by the board, with a minimum 2.0 grade point, or a grade of C or better, in each subject required by subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Credits shall include one course in psychology, one in mathematics, two courses in English composition, two courses in social science, and three courses selected from the following subjects: Behavioral sciences, public speaking, counseling, business administration and management, computer science, and first aid.

(3) This section does not apply to any person registered and in good standing as an apprentice funeral director or embalmer on or before January 1, 1982.

[ 2005 c 365 s 4; 1996 c 217 s 2; 1982 c 66 s 20; 1981 c 43 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1982 c 66: See note following RCW 18.39.240.